Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 31 The Rhode Island Bays, Rivers, and Watersheds Coordination Team

46-31-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 208, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

46-31-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 208, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

46-31-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 208, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

46-31-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 208, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

46-31-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 208, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

46-31-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 208, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

46-31-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 208, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

46-31-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 208, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

46-31-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 208, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

46-31-10.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 208, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

46-31-11.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 208, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

46-31-12.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 208, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

46-31-12.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 30, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

46-31-13.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 208, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

46-31-14.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 208, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.